District of Columbia statutes.
31-105

Transfers.

(a)

All positions, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, assessments, and other funds available or to be made available to the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs and the Public Service Commission relating to the duties and functions assigned herein, are transferred to the Department.

(b)

All powers, duties, and functions transferred to the Department of Banking and Financial Institutions under § 26-551.03, are hereby transferred to the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.

(c)

All positions, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, assessments, and other funds available or to be made available to the Department of Banking and Financial Institutions under § 26-551.03, are hereby transferred to the Department.

May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 6, 44 DCR 1730
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 3(e), 51 DCR 2817
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 40(d), 52 DCR 2638
1981 Ed., § 35-125.
D.C. Law 15-166 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); and added subsecs. (b) and (c).
D.C. Law 15-354, in subsec. (a), validated a previously made technical correction.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(e) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).